zh-TW: 瞄準鏡鏡頭類型: 消色差; 復消色差; 超低色散; 目鏡; 螢石; HD; 客觀; 超低色散; 廣角; 變焦; 其他
fi: Kiikaritähtäimen linssityyppi: Akromaattinen; Apokromaattinen; Erittäin alhainen dispersio; Okulaari; Fluoriitti; HD; Objektiivi; Erittäin alhainen dispersio; Laajakulma; Zoomaus; Muu
pl: Typ soczewki lunety: Achromatyczna; Apochromatyczna; Z bardzo niską dyspersją; Okular; Fluoryt; HD; Główna; Z ultra niską dyspersją; Szerokokątny; Powiększenie; Inne
ru: Тип линзы прицела: Ахроматический; Апохроматический; Сверхнизкая дисперсия; Окуляр; Флюорит; HD; Мишень; Очень низкая дисперсия; Широкий угол; Увеличение; Другое
es: Tipo de lente de la mira: Acromático; Apocromático; Dispersión extrabaja; Ocular; Fluorita; HD; Objetivo; Dispersión ultrabaja; Gran angular; Zoom; Otros
sk-SK: Typ ďalekohľadu: Achromatický; Apochromatický; Extra nízky rozptyl; Okulár; Fluorit; HD; Cieľ; Ultra nízka disperzia; Širokouhlý; Zoom; Iné
da: Linsetype for skop: Akromatisk; Apokromatisk; Ekstra lav spredning; Okular; Fluorit; HD; Objektiv; Ultra-lav spredning; Vidvinkel; Zoom; Andet
ko: 스코프 렌즈 타입: Achromatic; 아포크로매틱; 매우 낮은 분산율; 접안 렌즈; 형석; HD; 목적; 초저 분산율; 광각; 줌; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de lente de mira: Acromático; Apocromático; Dispersão extra baixa; Óculo; Fluorita; HD; Objetiva; Dispersão ultrabaixa; Grande angular; Zoom; Outro
cs: Typ objektivu zaměřovače: Achromatický; Apochromatický; Extra nízká disperze; Okulár; Fluorit; HD; Objektiv; Ultra nízká disperze; Široký úhel; Zoom; Jiné
lt-LT: Taikiklio objektyvo tipas: Achromatinis; Apochromatinis; Ypač („extra“) maža dispersija; Okuliaras; Fluoritas; HD; Objektyvas; Itin („ultra“) maža dispersija; Plataus kampo; Priartinantys; Kita
it: Tipo di obiettivo del mirino: Achromatic; Apocromatico; Dispersione estremamente bassa; Oculare; Fluorite; HD; Obbiettivo; Dispersione ultrabassa; Grandangolo; Zoom; Altro
nb: Omfangsobjektivvtype: Akromatisk; Apokromatisk; Ekstra lav spredning; Okular; Fluoritt; HD; Objektiv; Ultralav spredning; Vidvinkel; Zoom; Annet
nl: Type lens richtkijker: Achromatic; Apochromatisch; Extra lage spreiding; Oculair; Fluoriet; HD; Doel; Ultra lage spreiding; Groothoek; Zoom; Andere
ja: スコープレンズタイプ: 無彩色; アポクロマート; 超低分散; 接眼レンズ; 蛍石; HD; 客観的; 特殊低分散; 広角; ズーム; その他
ro-RO: Tip de lentilă pentru lunetă: Acromatic; Apocromatic; Dispersie foarte scăzută; Ocular; Fluorit; HD; Obiectiv; Dispersie ultra-scăzută; Unghi larg; Zoom; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta objektiva ciljnika: Akromatska; Apokromatski; Ekstra niska disperzija; Okular; Fluorit; HD; Cilj; Iznimno niska disperzija; Široki kut; Zumiranje; Ostalo
hu: Távcsőlencse típusa: Akromatikus; Apokromatikus; Extraalacsony szórású; Szemlencse; Fluorit; HD; Objektív; Ultraalacsony szórású; Széles látószögű; Zoom; Egyéb
fr: Type de lentille du viseur: Achromatique; Apochromatique; Dispersion très faible; Oculaire; Fluorine; HD; Objectif; Dispersion ultra-faible; Grand angle; Zoom; Autre
de: Zielfernrohr-Objektivtyp: Achromatisch; Apochromatisch; Besonders geringe Streuung; Okular; Fluorit; HD; Objektiv; Extrem geringe Streuung; Weitwinkel; Zoom; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de lentes de alcance: Acromático; Apocromático; Dispersão extra baixa; Ocular; Fluorite; HD; Objetivo; Dispersão ultra baixa; Ângulo amplo; Zoom; Outro
tr: Dürbün mercek tipi: Akromatik; Apokromatik; Ekstra düşük dağılım; mercek; Florit; HD; Objektif; Ekstra düşük dağılım; Geniş açı; Yakınlaştırma; Diğer
zh-CN: 瞄准镜镜片类型: 消色差; 复消色差; 超低色散 (ED); 目镜; 萤石; 高清; 物镜; 超低色散 (UD); 广角; 变焦; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta leče za daljnogled: Akromatski; Apokromatski; Izjemno nizka disperzija; Okular; Fluorit; HD; Objektiv; Izjemno nizka disperzija; Širok kot; Povečava; Drugo
el: Τύπος φακού σκόπευτρου: Αχρωματικός; Αποχρωματικός; Εξαιρετικά χαμηλή ανάλυση; Προσοφθάλμιο; Φθορίτης; HD; Αντικειμενικός; Εξαιρετικά χαμηλής ανάλυσης; Ευρυγώνιος; Ζουμ; Άλλο
en: Scope lens type: Achromatic; Apochromatic; Extra-low dispersion; Eyepiece; Fluorite; HD; Objective; Ultra-low dispersion; Wide-angle; Zoom; Other
bg-BG: Тип обхват на обектив: Ахроматичен; Апохроматичен; Изключително ниска дисперсия; Окуляр; Флуорит; HD; Цел; Изключително ниска дисперсия; Широкоъгълен; Увеличение; Други
vi: Loại ống kính lấy nét: Achromatic; Tiêu sắc; Độ phân tán cực thấp; Thị kính; Fluorit; HD; Khách quan; Độ phân tán cực thấp; Góc rộng; Thu/phóng; Khác
th: ประเภทเลนส์ของกล้องส่อง: Achromatic; Apochromatic; กระจายแสงต่ำพิเศษ; เลนส์ใกล้ตา; ฟลูออไรต์; HD; เลนส์ใกล้วัตถุ; กระจายแสงต่ำ; เลนส์มุมกว้าง; ซูม; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av objektiv för kikarsikte: Akromatisk; Apochromatic; Extra låg spridning; Okular; Fluorit; HD; Objektiv; Extra låg spridning; Vidvinkel; Zoom; Övrigt